Maryland, session 2025, HB1395.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–106.
(a) (1) Each county board may use volunteer aides in school activities in its
county.
(2) A COUNTY BOARD MAY USE A CHAPLAIN AS A VOLUNTEER AIDE IN
SCHOOLS TO PROVIDE SUPPORT SERVICES TO STUDENTS.
(b) A volunteer aide may not be used to supplant educational personnel but shall
be used to assist regular employees in their assignments.
(c) Each county superintendent shall establish guidelines for the use of volunteer
aides in the school system of the superintendent’s county.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1395*

HOUSE BILL 1395
(d) A volunteer aide is considered an agent of the county board for the limited
purposes of:
(1) Comprehensive liability insurance coverage under § 4–105 of this
article; and
(2) Workers’ compensation coverage under the Maryland Workers’
Compensation Act.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.